North Carolina statutes. Chapter 39. Conveyances.
Article 3A. Uniform Voidable Transactions Act.
§ 39-23.5.
Transfer or obligation voidable as to present creditor.

A transfer made or obligation incurred by a debtor is voidable as to a creditor whose claim arose before the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred if the debtor made the transfer or incurred the obligation without receiving a reasonably equivalent
value in exchange for the transfer or obligation, and the debtor was insolvent at that time or the debtor became insolvent as a result of the transfer or obligation.

A transfer made by a debtor is voidable as to a creditor whose claim arose before the transfer was made if the transfer was made to an insider for an antecedent debt, the debtor was insolvent at that time, and the insider had reasonable cause to believe
that the debtor was insolvent.

Subject to

G.S. 39-23.2(b)

, a creditor making a claim for relief under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section has the burden of proving the elements of the claim for relief by a preponderance of the evidence.

History.
1997-291, s. 2; 2015-23, s. 1.

Official Comment (2014)

Subsection (a) is derived from § 4 of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. It adheres to the limitation of the protection of that section to a creditor whose claim arose before the transfer or obligation described. As pointed out in Comment 3 accompanying
§ 4, this Act substitutes “reasonably equivalent value” for “fair consideration.”

Subsection (b) renders a preferential transfer—i.e., a transfer by an insolvent debtor for or on account of an antecedent debt—to an insider voidable when the insider had reasonable cause to believe that the debtor was insolvent. This subsection adopts
for general application the rule of such cases as Jackson Sound Studios, Inc. v. Travis, 473 F.2d 503 (5th Cir. 1973) (security transfer of corporation’s equipment to corporate principal’s mother perfected on eve of bankruptcy
of corporation held to be voidable); In re Lamie Chemical Co., 296 F. 24 (4th Cir. 1924) (corporate preference to corporate officers and directors held voidable by receiver when corporation was insolvent or nearly so and directors
had already voted for liquidation); Stuart v. Larson, 298 F. 223 (8th Cir. 1924), noted 38 Harv.L.Rev. 521 (1925) (corporate preference to director held voidable). See generally 2 G. Glenn, Fraudulent Conveyances and Preferences
386 (Rev. ed. 1940). Subsection (b) overrules such cases as Epstein v. Goldstein, 107 F.2d 755, 757 (2d Cir. 1939) (transfer by insolvent husband to wife to secure his debt to her sustained against attack by husband’s trustee);
Hartford Accident & Indemnity Co. v. Jirasek, 254 Mich. 131, 139, 235 N.W. 836, 389 (1931) (mortgage given by debtor to his brother to secure an antecedent debt owed the brother sustained as not voidable).

Subsection (b) does not extend as far as § 8(a) of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act and Bankruptcy Code § 548(b) (1984) in rendering voidable a transfer made by an insolvent partnership to a partner. A general partner is an insider of the partnership,
but a transfer by the partnership to the partner nevertheless is not vulnerable to avoidance under § 5(b) unless the transfer is for an antecedent debt and the partner has reasonable cause to believe that the partnership is insolvent.
By contrast, the cited provisions of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act and the Bankruptcy Code make any transfer by an insolvent partnership to a general partner voidable. Avoidance of the partnership transfer without reference
to the partner’s state of mind and the nature of the consideration exchanged would be unduly harsh treatment of the creditors of the partner and unduly favorable to the creditors of the partnership.

Subsection (c) was added in 2014. Sections 2(b), 4(c), 5(c), 8(g), and 8(h) together provide uniform rules on burdens and standards of proof relating to the operation of this Act. The principles stated in Comment 11 to § 4 apply to subsection (c).

§ 39-23.6.
When transfer is made or obligation is incurred.

For the purposes of this Article:

A transfer is made:

With respect to an asset that is real property other than a fixture, but including the interest of a seller or purchaser under a contract for the sale of the asset, when the transfer is so far perfected that a good-faith purchaser of the asset from the
debtor against which applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected cannot acquire an interest in the asset that is superior to the interest of the transferee; and

With respect to an asset that is not real property or that is a fixture, when the transfer is so far perfected that a creditor on a simple contract cannot acquire a judicial lien otherwise than under this Article that is superior to the interest of the
transferee.

If applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected as provided in subdivision (1) of this section and the transfer is not so perfected before the commencement of an action for relief under this Article, the transfer is deemed made immediately before
the commencement of the action.

If applicable law does not permit the transfer to be perfected as provided in subdivision (1) of this section, the transfer is made when it becomes effective between the debtor and the transferee.

A transfer is not made until the debtor has acquired rights in the asset transferred.

An obligation is incurred:

If oral, when it becomes effective between the parties; or

If evidenced by a record, when the record signed by the obligor is delivered to or for the benefit of the obligee.

History.
1997-291, s. 2; 2015-23, s. 1.

Official Comment (2014)

One of the uncertainties in the law governing the avoidance of transfers and obligations of the nature governed by this Act is the time at which the cause of action arises. Section 6 clarifies that point in time. For transfers of real property other than
a fixture, paragraph (1)(i) fixes the time as the date of perfection against a good-faith purchaser from the transferor. For transfers of fixtures and assets constituting personalty, paragraph (1)(ii) fixes the time as the date
of perfection against a judicial lien creditor not asserting rights under this Act. Perfection under paragraph (1) typically is effected by notice-filing, recordation, or delivery of unequivocal possession. See U.C.C. §§ 9-310,
9-313 (2014) (security interest in personal property generally is perfected by notice-filing or delivery of possession to transferee); 4 American Law of Property §§ 17.10-17.12 (1952) (recordation of transfer or delivery of possession
to grantee required for perfection against bona fide purchaser from grantor). The provision for postponing the time a transfer is made until its perfection is an adaptation of Bankruptcy Code § 548(d)(1) (1984). When no steps are
taken to perfect a transfer that applicable law permits to be perfected, the transfer is deemed by paragraph (2) to be perfected immediately before the filing of an action to avoid it; without such a provision to cover that eventuality,
an unperfected transfer arguably would be immune to attack. Some transfers may not be amenable to perfection as against a bona fide purchaser or judicial lien creditor. In the event that a transfer may not be perfected as provided
in paragraph (1), paragraph (3) provides that the transfer occurs for the purpose of this Act when the transferor effectively parts with an interest in the asset.

Paragraph (4) requires the transferor to have rights in the asset transferred before the transfer is made for the purpose of this section. This provision makes clear that the purpose of this section may not be circumvented by notice-filing or recordation
of a document evidencing an interest in an asset to be acquired in the future. Cf. Bankruptcy Code § 547(e) (1984); U.C.C. § 9-203(b)(2) (2014).

Paragraph (5) had no analogue in the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. It is intended to resolve uncertainty arising from Rubin v. Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co., 661 F.2d 979, 989-91, 997 (2d Cir. 1981), insofar as that case holds that an obligation
of guaranty may be deemed to be incurred when advances covered by the guaranty are made rather than when the guaranty first became effective between the parties. Compare Rosenberg, Intercorporate Guaranties and the Law of Fraudulent
Conveyances: Lender Beware, 125 U.Pa.L.Rev. 235, 256-57 (1976).

An obligation may be avoided under this Act if it is incurred under the circumstances specified in § 4(a) or § 5(a). The debtor may receive reasonably equivalent value in exchange for an obligation incurred even though the benefit to the debtor is indirect.
See Rubin v. Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co ., 661 F.2d at 991-92;

Williams v. Twin City Co
., 251 F.2d 678, 681 (9th Cir. 1958); Rosenberg,

supra
, at 243-46.

Under paragraph (5), an oral obligation is incurred when it becomes effective between the parties, and later confirmation of the oral obligation by a record does not reset the time of incurrence to that later time.

§ 39-23.7.
Remedies of creditor.

In an action for relief against a transfer or obligation under this Article, a creditor, subject to the limitations in

G.S. 39-23.8

, may obtain:

Avoidance of the transfer or obligation to the extent necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim;

An attachment or other provisional remedy against the asset transferred or other property of the transferee if available under applicable law; and

Subject to applicable principles of equity and in accordance with applicable rules of civil procedure:

An injunction against further disposition by the debtor or a transferee, or both, of the asset transferred or of other property;

Appointment of a receiver to take charge of the asset transferred or of other property of the transferee; or

Any other relief the circumstances may require.

If a creditor has obtained a judgment on a claim against the debtor, the creditor, if the court so orders, may levy execution on the asset transferred or its proceeds.

History.
1997-291, s. 2; 2015-23, s. 1.

Official Comment (2014)

This section is derived from §§ 9 and 10 of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. Section 9 of that Act specified the remedies of creditors whose claims have matured, and § 10 enumerated the remedies available to creditors whose claims have not matured.
A creditor holding an unmatured claim may be denied the right to receive payment from the proceeds of a sale on execution until the claim has matured, but the proceeds may be deposited in court or in an interest-bearing account
pending the maturity of the creditor’s claim. The remedies specified in this section are not exclusive.

The availability of an attachment or other provisional remedy has been restricted by amendments of statutes and rules of procedure in response to Connecticut v. Doehr, 501 U.S. 1 (1991), Sniadach v. Family Finance Corp., 395 U.S. 337 (1969), and their
progeny. This judicial development and the procedural changes that followed in its wake do not preclude resort to attachment by a creditor in seeking avoidance of a transfer or obligation. See, e.g., Britton v. Howard Sav. Bank,
727 F.2d 315, 317-20 (3d Cir. 1984); Computer Sciences Corp. v. Sci-Tek Inc., 367 A.2d 658, 661 (Del. Super. 1976); Great Lakes Carbon Corp. v. Fontana, 54 A.D.2d 548, 387 N.Y.S. 2d 115 (1st Dep’t 1976). Section 7(a)(2) continues
the authorization for the use of attachment contained in § 9(b) of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, or of a similar provisional remedy, when applicable law provides therefor, subject to the constraints imposed by the due
process clauses of the United States and state constitutions.

Subsections (a) and (b) of § 10 of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act authorized the court, in an action on a voidable transfer or obligation, to restrain the defendant from disposing of his property, to appoint a receiver to take charge of his property,
or to make any order the circumstances may require. Section 10, however, applied only to a creditor whose claim was unmatured. There is no reason to restrict the availability of these remedies to such a creditor, and the courts
have not so restricted them. See, e.g., Lipskey v. Voloshen, 155 Md. 139, 143-45, 141 Atl. 402, 404-05 (1928) (judgment creditor granted injunction against disposition of property by transferee, but appointment of receiver denied
for lack of sufficient showing of need for such relief); Matthews v. Schusheim, 36 Misc. 2d 918, 922-23, 235 N.Y.S.2d 973, 976-77, 991-92 (Sup.Ct. 1962) (injunction and appointment of receiver granted to holder of claims for fraud,
breach of contract, and alimony arrearages; whether creditor’s claim was mature said to be immaterial); Oliphant v. Moore, 155 Tenn. 359, 362-63, 293 S.W. 541, 542 (1927) (tort creditor granted injunction restraining alleged tortfeasor’s
disposition of property).

As under the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, a creditor is not required to obtain a judgment against the debtor-transferor or to have a matured claim in order to proceed under subsection (a). See §§ 1(3) and 1(4); American Surety Co. v. Conner, 251
N.Y. 1, 166 N.E. 783, 65 A.L.R. 244 (1929); 1 G. Glenn, Fraudulent Conveyances and Preferences 129 (Rev. ed. 1940).

The provision in subsection (b) for a creditor to levy execution on a transferred asset continues the availability of a remedy provided in § 9(b) of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. See, e.g., Doland v. Burns Lbr. Co., 156 Minn. 238, 194 N.W. 636
(1923); Montana Ass’n of Credit Management v. Hergert, 181 Mont. 442, 449, 453, 593 P.2d 1059, 1063, 1065 (1979); Corbett v. Hunter, 292 Pa.Super. 123, 128, 436 A.2d 1036, 1038 (1981); see also American Surety Co. v. Conner, 251
N.Y. 1, 6, 166 N.E. 783, 784, 65 A.L.R. 244, 247 (1929) (“In such circumstances he [the creditor] might find it necessary to indemnify the sheriff and, when the seizure was erroneous, assumed the risk of error”); McLaughlin, Application
of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, 46 Harv.L.Rev. 404, 441-42 (1933).

The remedies specified in § 7, like those enumerated in §§ 9 and 10 of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, are cumulative. Lind v. O. N. Johnson Co., 204 Minn. 30, 40, 282 N.W. 661, 667, 119 A.L.R. 940 (1939) (Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act held
not to impair or limit availability of the “old practice” of obtaining judgment and execution returned unsatisfied before proceeding in equity to set aside a transfer); Conemaugh Iron Works Co. v. Delano Coal Co., Inc., 298 Pa.
182, 186, 148 A. 94, 95 (1929) (Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act held to give an “additional optional remedy” and not to “deprive a creditor of the right, as formerly, to work out his remedy at law”); 1 G. Glenn, Fraudulent Conveyances
and Preferences 120, 130, 150 (Rev. ed. 1940).

If a transfer or obligation is voidable under § 4 or § 5, the basic remedy provided by this Act is its avoidance under subsection (a)(1). “Avoidance” is a term of art in this Act, for it does not mean that the transfer or obligation is simply rendered
void. It has long been established that a transfer avoided by a creditor under this Act or its predecessors is nevertheless valid as between the debtor and the transferee. For example, in the case of a transfer of property worth
$100 by Debtor to Transferee, held voidable in a suit by Creditor-1 who is owed $80 by Debtor, “avoidance” of the transfer leaves the $20 surplus with Transferee. Debtor is not entitled to recover the surplus. Nor is Debtor’s Creditor-2
entitled to pursue the surplus by reason of Creditor-1’s action (though Creditor-2 may be entitled to bring its own avoidance action to pursue the surplus). The foregoing principle is embedded in the language of subsection (a)(1),
which prescribes “avoidance” only “to the extent necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim.” Section 9(a) of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act was similarly limited. See, e.g., Becker v. Becker, 416 A.2d 156, 162 (Vt. 1980);
De Martini v. De Martini, 52 N.E.2d 138, 141 (Ill. 1943); Markward v. Murrah, 156 S.W.2d 971, 974 (Tex. 1941); Society Milion Athena, Inc. v. National Bank of Greece, 22 N.E.2d 374, 377 (N.Y. 1939); National Radiator Corp. v. Parad,
8 N.E.2d 794, 796-97 (Mass. 1937); 1 G. Glenn, Fraudulent Conveyances and Preferences § 114, at 225 (Rev. ed. 1940). The transferee’s mental state is irrelevant to the foregoing, but a good-faith transferee may also be afforded
protection by § 8.

It follows that “avoidance” of an obligation under subsection (a)(1) likewise should not mean its cancellation, but rather a remedy that recognizes the existence of the obligation and the superiority of the plaintiff creditor’s interest over the obligee’s
interest. Ordinarily that should mean subordination of the obligation to the plaintiff creditor’s claim against the debtor. That would entail disgorgement by the obligee of any payments received or receivable on the obligation, to
the extent necessary to satisfy the plaintiff creditor’s claim, with the obligee being subrogated to the plaintiff creditor when the latter’s claim is paid. Of course, if the obligation is unenforceable for reasons other than contravention
of this Act, contravention of this Act does not render the obligation enforceable.

This Comment relates to the meaning of subsection (a)(1). If this Act is invoked in a bankruptcy proceeding, the remedial entitlements provided by the Bankruptcy Code may differ from those provided by this Act.

§ 39-23.8.
Defenses, liability, and protection of transferee or obligee.

A transfer or obligation is not voidable under G.S. 39-23.4(a)(1) against a person that took in good faith and for a reasonably equivalent value given the debtor or against any subsequent transferee or obligee.

To the extent a transfer is avoidable in an action by a creditor under G.S. 39-23.7(a)(1), the following rules apply:

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the creditor may recover judgment for the value of the asset transferred, as adjusted under subsection (c) of this section, or the amount necessary to satisfy the creditor’s claim, whichever is less. The judgment
may be entered against any of the following:

The first transferee of the asset or the person for whose benefit the transfer was made.

An immediate or mediate transferee of the first transferee, other than any of the following:

A good-faith transferee that took for value.

An immediate or mediate good-faith transferee of a person described in sub-sub-subdivision 1. of this sub-subdivision.

Recovery pursuant to G.S. 39-23.7(a)(1) or

G.S. 39-23.7(b)

of or from the asset transferred or its proceeds, by levy or otherwise, is available only against a person described in sub-subdivision a. or b. of subdivision (1) of this subsection.

If the judgment under subsection (b) of this section is based upon the value of the asset transferred, the judgment shall be for an amount equal to the value of the asset at the time of the transfer, subject to adjustment as the equities may require.

Notwithstanding voidability of a transfer or an obligation under this Article, a good-faith transferee or obligee is entitled, to the extent of the value given the debtor for the transfer or obligation, to any of the following:

A lien on or a right to retain an interest in the asset transferred.

Enforcement of an obligation incurred.

A reduction in the amount of the liability on the judgment.

A transfer is not voidable under G.S. 39-23.4(a)(2) or

G.S. 39-23.5

if the transfer results from one or more of the following:

Termination of a lease upon default by the debtor when the termination is pursuant to the lease and applicable law.

Enforcement of a security interest in compliance with Article 9 of Chapter 25 of the General Statutes, the Uniform Commercial Code, other than acceptance of collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures.

The payment of taxes, debts, fines, penalties, or other obligations or amounts to the State or to any political subdivision of the State.

A transfer is not voidable under

G.S. 39-23.5(b)

:

To the extent the insider gave new value to or for the benefit of the debtor after the transfer was made, except to the extent the new value was secured by a valid lien;

If made in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs of the debtor and the insider; or

If made pursuant to a good-faith effort to rehabilitate the debtor, and the transfer secured present value given for that purpose as well as an antecedent debt of the debtor.

The following rules determine the burden of proving matters referred to in this section:

A party that seeks to invoke subsection (a), (d), (e), or (f) of this section has the burden of proving the applicability of that subsection.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (3) and (4) of this subsection, the creditor has the burden of proving each applicable element of subsection (b) or (c) of this section.

The transferee has the burden of proving the applicability to the transferee of sub-sub-subdivision (b)(1)b.1. or 2. of this section.

A party that seeks adjustment under subsection (c) of this section has the burden of proving the adjustment.

The standard of proof required to establish matters referred to in this section is preponderance of the evidence.

History.
1997-291, s. 2; 2015-23, s. 1; 2017-204, s. 3.3(b); 2018-142, s. 7(b).

Official Comment (2014)

Subsection (a) sets forth a complete defense to an action for avoidance under § 4(a)(1). The subsection is an adaptation of the exception stated in § 9 of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. Pursuant to subsection (g), the person invoking this defense
carries the burden of establishing good faith and the reasonable equivalence of the consideration exchanged.

Subsection (b) is derived from Bankruptcy Code §§ 550(a), (b) (1984). The value of the asset transferred is limited to the value of the levyable interest of the transferor, exclusive of any interest encumbered by a valid lien. See § 1(2).

Subsection (c) has no analogue in Bankruptcy Code § 550(a), (b) (1984). The measure of the recovery of a creditor against a transferee is usually limited to the value of the asset transferred at the time of the transfer. See, e.g., United States v. Fernon,
640 F.2d 609, 611 (5th Cir. 1981); Hamilton Nat’l Bank of Boston v. Halstead, 134 N.Y. 520, 31 N.E. 900 (1892); cf. Buffum v. Peter Barceloux Co., 289 U.S. 227 (1932) (transferee’s objection to trial court’s award of highest value
of asset between the date of the transfer and the date of the decree of avoidance rejected because an award measured by value as of time of the transfer plus interest from that date would have been larger). The premise of § 8(c)
is that changes in value of the asset transferred that occur after the transfer should ordinarily not affect the amount of the creditor’s recovery. Circumstances may require a departure from that measure of the recovery, however,
as the cases decided under the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act and other laws derived from the Statute of 13 Elizabeth illustrate. Thus, if the value of the asset at the time of levy and sale to enforce the judgment of the creditor
has been enhanced by improvements of the asset transferred or discharge of liens on the property, a good-faith transferee should be reimbursed for the outlay for such a purpose to the extent the sale proceeds were increased thereby.
See Bankruptcy Code § 550(d) (1984); Janson v. Schier, 375 A.2d 1159, 1160 (N.H. 1977); Anno., 8 A.L.R. 527 (1920). If the value of the asset at the time of the transfer has been diminished by severance and disposition of timber
or minerals or fixtures, the transferee should be liable for the amount of the resulting reduction. See Damazo v. Wahby, 269 Md. 252, 257, 305 A.2d 138, 142 (1973). If the transferee has collected rents, harvested crops, or derived
other income from the use or occupancy of the asset after the transfer, the liability of the transferee should be limited in any event to the net income after deduction of the expense incurred in earning the income. Anno., 60 A.L.R.2d
593 (1958). On the other hand, adjustment for the equities does not warrant an award to the creditor of consequential damages alleged to accrue from mismanagement of the asset after the transfer.

Subsection (d) is an adaptation of Bankruptcy Code § 548(c) (1984). An insider that receives property or an obligation from an insolvent debtor as security for or in satisfaction of an antecedent debt of the transferor or obligor is not a good-faith transferee
or obligee if the insider has reasonable cause to believe that the debtor was insolvent at the time the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred. If a foreclosure sale is voidable and does not qualify for the benefit of
§ 3(b) or § 8(e)(2) because it was not conducted in accordance with the requirements of applicable law, the buyer, if in good faith, will still be entitled to the benefit of subsection (d) to the extent of the price paid by the
buyer.

Subsection (e)(1) rejects the rule adopted in Darby v. Atkinson (In re Farris), 415 F. Supp. 33, 39-41 (W.D.Okla. 1976), that termination of a lease on default in accordance with its terms and applicable law may constitute a voidable transfer.

Subsection (f) provides additional defenses against the avoidance of a preferential transfer to an insider under § 5(b).

Subsections (g) and (h) were added in 2014. Sections 2(b), 4(c), 5(c), 8(g), and 8(h) together provide uniform rules on burdens and standards of proof relating to the operation of this Act. The principles stated in Comment 11 to § 4 apply to subsections
(g) and (h).

The provisions of § 8 are integral elements of the rights created by this Act. Accordingly, they should apply if this Act is invoked in a bankruptcy proceeding pursuant to Bankruptcy Code § 544(b) (2014). That follows from the fundamental principle that
property rights in bankruptcy should be the same as outside bankruptcy, unless a federal interest compels a different result. See Butner v. United States, 440 U.S. 48, 55 (1979). Section 8(b) limits damages under this Act to the
amount of the plaintiff creditor’s claim, and that limitation is overridden in bankruptcy by the rule of Moore v. Bay, 284 U.S. 4 (1931), which Congress unmistakably maintained when it enacted the Bankruptcy Code. In the absence
of a clear override by the Bankruptcy Code or other federal law, however, other aspects of § 8 should apply if this Act is invoked in bankruptcy. See, e.g., Decker v. Tramiel (In re JTS Corp.), 617 F.3d 1102, 1110-16 (9th Cir.
2010) (holding that § 8(d) applies to a claim for relief brought under this Act in a bankruptcy proceeding pursuant to Bankruptcy Code § 544(b)).

The requirement of Bankruptcy Code § 550(b)(1) (1984) that a transferee be “without knowledge of the voidability of the transfer” in order to be protected has been omitted as inappropriate. Knowledge of the facts rendering the transfer voidable would
be inconsistent with the good faith that is required of a protected transferee. Knowledge of the voidability of a transfer would seem to involve a legal conclusion. Determination of the voidability of the transfer ought not to require
the court to inquire into the legal sophistication of the transferee.

A transfer of property by the transferee of a voidable transfer might, on appropriate facts, be avoidable for reasons independent of the original voidable transfer. In such a case the subsequent transferee may be entitled to a defense under § 8(b) to
an action based on the original voidable transfer, but that defense would not apply to an action based on the subsequent transfer that is independently voidable. For example, suppose that X transfers property to Y in a transfer voidable
under this Act, and that Y later transfers the property to Z, who is a good-faith transferee for value. In general, C-1, a creditor of X, would have the right to a money judgment against Y pursuant to § 8(b), but C-1 could not recover
under this Act from Z, who would be protected by § 8(b)(1)(ii)(A). However, it might be the case that Y’s transfer to Z is independently voidable as to Y’s creditors (including C-1, as creditor of Y by dint of its rights under this
Act). Such might be the case if, for example, the value received by Y in exchange for the transfer is not reasonably equivalent and Y is in financial distress, or if Y made the transfer with intent to hinder, delay, or defraud any
of its creditors. In such a case creditors of Y may pursue remedies against Z with respect to that independently voidable transfer, and the defense afforded to Z by § 8(b)(1)(ii)(A) would not apply to that action. Of course choice
of law must be considered in such a situation: the jurisdiction whose law governs the voidability of the original transfer from X to Y and the consequent liability of Y and subsequent transferees need not be the same as the jurisdiction
whose law governs the voidability of the independently voidable transfer from Y to Z and the consequent liability of Z and subsequent transferees.

Subsection (e)(2) protects a transferee that acquires a debtor’s interest in an asset as a result of the enforcement by a secured party (which may but need not be the transferee) of rights pursuant to and in compliance with the provisions of Part 6 of
Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code. Cf. Calaiaro v. Pittsburgh Nat’l Bank (In re Ewing) , 33 B.R. 288, 9 C.B.C.2d 526, CCH B.L.R. ¶ 69,460 (Bankr. W.D.Pa. 1983) (sale of pledged stock held subject to avoidance under § 548 of
the Bankruptcy Code),

rev’d
, 36 B.R. 476 (W.D.Pa. 1984) (transfer held not voidable because deemed to have occurred more than one year before bankruptcy petition filed). The global requirement of Article 9 that the secured party enforce its rights
in good faith, and the further requirement of Article 9 that certain remedies be conducted in a commercially reasonable manner, provide substantial protection to the other creditors of the debtor. See U.C.C. §§ 1-304, 9-607(b), 9-610(b)
(2014). The exemption afforded by subsection (e)(2) does not extend to acceptance of collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligations it secures. That remedy, contemplated by U.C.C. §§ 9-620—9-622 (2014), is sometimes
referred to as “strict foreclosure.” An exemption for strict foreclosure is inappropriate because compliance with the rules of Article 9 relating to strict foreclosure may not sufficiently protect the interests of the debtor’s other
creditors if the debtor does not act to protect equity the debtor may have in the asset.

Paragraph (1) is adapted from Bankruptcy Code § 547(c)(4) (1984), which permits a preferred creditor to set off the amount of new value subsequently advanced against the recovery of a voidable preference by a trustee in bankruptcy to the debtor without
security. The new value may consist not only of money, goods, or services delivered on unsecured credit but also of the release of a valid lien. See, e.g., In re Ira Haupt & Co ., 424 F.2d 722, 724 (2d Cir. 1970);

Baranow v. Gibraltor Factors Corp. (In re Hygrade Envelope Co.)
, 393 F.2d 60, 65-67 (2d Cir.), cert. denied, 393 U.S. 837 (1968);

In re John Morrow & Co
., 134 F. 686, 688 (S.D.Ohio 1901). It does not include an obligation substituted for a prior obligation. If the insider receiving the preference thereafter extends new credit to the debtor but also takes security from the
debtor, the injury to the other creditors resulting from the preference remains undiminished by the new credit. On the other hand, if a lien taken to secure the new credit is itself voidable by a judicial lien creditor of the debtor,
the new value received by the debtor may appropriately be treated as unsecured and applied to reduce the liability of the insider for the preferential transfer.

Paragraph (2) is derived from Bankruptcy Code § 547(c)(2) (1984), which excepts certain payments made in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs from avoidance by the trustee in bankruptcy as preferential transfers. Whether a transfer was
in the “ordinary course” requires a consideration of the pattern of payments or secured transactions engaged in by the debtor and the insider prior to the transfer challenged under § 5(b). See Tait & Williams, Bankruptcy Preference
Laws: The Scope of Section 547(c)(2) , 99 Banking L.J. 55, 63-66 (1982). The defense provided by paragraph (2) is available, irrespective of whether the debtor or the insider or both are engaged in business, but the prior conduct or
practice of both the debtor and the insider-transferee are relevant.

Paragraph (3) has no analogue in Bankruptcy Code § 547 (1984). It reflects a policy judgment that an insider who has previously extended credit to a debtor should not be deterred from extending further credit to the debtor in a good-faith effort to save
the debtor from a forced liquidation in bankruptcy or otherwise. A similar rationale has sustained the taking of security from an insolvent debtor for an advance to enable the debtor to stave off bankruptcy and extricate itself from
financial stringency. Blackman v. Bechtel , 80 F.2d 505, 508-09 (8th Cir. 1935);

Olive v. Tyler .(In re Chelan Land Co.)
, 257 F. 497, 5 A.L.R. 561 (9th Cir. 1919);

In re Robin Bros. Bakeries, Inc
., 22 F. Supp. 662, 663-64 (N.D.Ill. 1937); see

Dean v. Davis
, 242 U.S. 438, 444 (1917). The amount of the present value given, the size of the antecedent debt secured, and the likelihood of success for the rehabilitative effort are relevant considerations in determining whether the
transfer was in good faith.

§ 39-23.9.
Extinguishment of claim for relief.

A claim for relief with respect to a voidable transfer or obligation under this Article is extinguished unless action is brought:

Under G.S. 39-23.4(a)(1), not later than four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred or, if later, not later than one year after the transfer or obligation was or could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant;

Under G.S. 39-23.4(a)(2) or

G.S. 39-23.5(a)

, not later than four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred; or

Under

G.S. 39-23.5(b)

, not later than one year after the transfer was made.

History.
1997-291, s. 2; 2015-23, s. 1.

Official Comment (2014)

This section had no analogue in the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act. Its purpose is to make clear that lapse of the statutory periods prescribed by the section bars the right and not merely the remedy. The section rejects the rule applied in United
States v. Gleneagles Inv. Co., 565 F. Supp. 556, 583 (M.D.Pa. 1983) (state statute of limitations held not to apply to action by United States based on Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act). Another consequence of barring the right
and not merely the remedy is that, under Restatement (Second) of Conflict of Laws § 143 (1971), if an action is brought in jurisdiction A and the action is determined to be governed by this Act as enacted in jurisdiction B, the
action cannot be maintained if it is time-barred in jurisdiction B. The 1988 revision of §§ 142 and 143 of the Restatement (Second) of Conflict of Laws, which eliminated the right/remedy distinction, should not be applied to this
Act. Because a voidable transfer or obligation may injure all of a debtor’s many creditors, there is need for a uniform and predictable cutoff time.

Statutes of limitations applicable to the avoidance of transfers and obligations vary widely from state to state and are frequently subject to uncertainties in their application. See Hesson, The Statute of Limitations in Actions to Set Aside Fraudulent
Conveyances and in Actions Against Directors by Creditors of Corporations, 32 Cornell L.Q. 222 (1946); Annos., 76 A.L.R. 864 (1932), 128 A.L.R. 1289 (1940), 133 A.L.R. 1311 (1941), 14 A.L.R.2d 598 (1950), and 100 A.L.R.2d 1094
(1965). Together with § 6, this section should mitigate the uncertainty and diversity that have characterized the decisions applying statutes of limitations to actions to avoid transfers and obligations. The periods prescribed
apply, whether the action under this Act is brought by a creditor or by a purchaser at a sale on execution levied pursuant to § 7(b) and whether the action is brought against the original transferee or subsequent transferee. The
prescription of statutory periods of limitation does not preclude the barring of an avoidance action for laches. See § 12 and the accompanying Comment.

Subsection (a) provides that the four-year period ordinarily applicable to a claim for relief under § 4(a)(1) is extended to “one year after the transfer or obligation was or could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant.” Antecedents to that
“discovery rule” have long existed in common law and in other statutes, and courts may take different approaches to filling out the meaning of subsection (a) by reference to such precedents. Thus, subsection (a) literally starts
the one-year period when the transfer was or could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant, but cases applying subsection (a) have held that the period starts only when the transfer and its wrongful nature were or could
reasonably have been discovered. See, e.g., Freitag v. McGhie, 947 P.2d 1186 (Wash. 1997); State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Cordua, 834 F. Supp.2d 301, 306-08 (E.D. Pa. 2011). A recurring situation to which that distinction may
be relevant is Spouse X’s transfer of assets beyond the reach of creditors, made in anticipation of divorcing Spouse Y after the four-year period has elapsed and made for the purpose of thwarting Spouse Y’s economic interests in
the divorce. Spouse Y may well know of the transfer long before Spouse Y learns its wrongful purpose. Of course, even if the period specified in subsection (a) is held to have lapsed in a given case, law other than this Act might
allow the transferred assets to be considered in making a division of assets in the ensuing divorce case.